src/phonology/mhr-phon.twolc
!! !!!Mari twol file

!! This file contains rules for morphophonological alternations, such as
!! vowel harmony, stem vowel changes, palatalisation, etc.

!! We define our symbols (__Alphabet__), some __Sets__, and then the __Rules__

Alphabet

!! !!Letters of the alphabet
а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н ҥ о ӧ п р с т у ӱ ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я ӓ ӹ !!= * @CODE@
А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н Ҥ О Ӧ П Р С Т У Ӱ Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я Ӓ Ӹ !!= * @CODE@

!! other symbols
«
»
•:0
ʼ:0
   %- !!= * @CODE@
%^END:0

!! Archiphonemes for vowels, Giellatekno style
  Е1:е а1:а и1:и у1:у ӱ1:ӱ я1:я  !!= * @CODE@ 
  Ы1:ы 
 Ы2:е    !!= * @CODE@ Variation in еоыӧØ
  А1:а   !!= * @CODE@ 
  Е2:е А2:а  !!= * @CODE@ 

!! Archiphonemes for vowels, Apertium style
%{аы%}:а !!= * @CODE@ Stem-final vowel variation when stress falls on non-final vowel
%{аы%}:ы !!= * @CODE@ Stem-final vowel variation when stress falls on non-final vowel
%{еы%}:е !!= * @CODE@ Stem-final vowel variation when stress falls on non-final vowel
%{еы%}:ы !!= * @CODE@ Stem-final vowel variation when stress falls on non-final vowel
%{оы%}:о !!= * @CODE@ Stem-final vowel variation when stress falls on non-final vowel
%{оы%}:ы !!= * @CODE@ Stem-final vowel variation when stress falls on non-final vowel
%{ӧы%}:ӧ !!= * @CODE@ Stem-final vowel variation when stress falls on non-final vowel
%{ӧы%}:ы !!= * @CODE@ Stem-final vowel variation when stress falls on non-final vowel

%{яы%}:я !!= * @CODE@ Stem-final vowel variation when stress falls on non-final vowel
%{яы%}:ы !!= * @CODE@ Stem-final vowel variation when stress falls on non-final vowel

%{еоыӧØ%}:е  !!= * @CODE@ PxSg3 final
%{еоыӧØ%}:о  !!= * @CODE@ PxSg3 final
%{еоыӧØ%}:ӧ  !!= * @CODE@ PxSg3 final
%{еоыӧØ%}:0  !!= * @CODE@ PxSg3 final
%{еоыӧØ%}:ы  !!= * @CODE@ PxSg3 final
%{ыØ%}:ы  !!= * @CODE@ PxSg3 onset
%{ыØ%}:0  !!= * @CODE@ PxSg3 onset

%{ьØ%}:0  !!= * @CODE@ for -ам verbs Prt1 Sg1, Sg2, Sg3, Pl3 л н


 Е1:е !!= * @CODE@ for lative

!  Е1:Е А1:А И1:И У1:У Ӱ1:Ӱ
!JMR 2012-09-18

!! !Arcihphonemes for consonants

з2:з  !!= * @CODE@ for з:ч, thus  возаш - воч but колхоз (*колхоч)
з2:ч  !!= * @CODE@ for native stems
к2:0  !!= * @CODE@ кочк- коч# "eat/есть" мушк- муш "wash/мыть"
к2:к  !!= * @CODE@ кочк- коч# "eat/есть" мушк- муш "wash/мыть"
н2:0  !!= * @CODE@ шинч- шич# "sit down/сесть"
н2:н  !!= * @CODE@ шинч- шич# "sit down/сесть"
т2:0  !!= * @CODE@ лект- лек# "leave/ уходить"
т2:т  !!= * @CODE@ лект- лек# "leave/ уходить"



! Boundary symbols
%^V2IMPRT:0	!!= * @CODE@ for -ем verbs in й
%^END:0		  !!= * @CODE@ for -ам verb final, i.e. Imprf

%^VoTrigger:0  !!= * @CODE@ for use with acronyms after hyphen о у ё ю О У Ё Ю
%^VeTrigger:0  !!= * @CODE@ for use with acronyms after hyphen а е и э я А Е И Э Я
%^VOTrigger:0  !!= * @CODE@ for use with acronyms after hyphen ӧ ӱ Ӧ Ӱ
%^Sonorant:0   !!= * @CODE@ for use with acronyms after hyphen Л|М|Н|Р|Ҥ
%^Obstruent:0 !!= * @CODE@ for use with acronyms after hyphen С|Ф|Ъ|Ь
%^FrontObstr:0 !!= * @CODE@ for use with acronyms after hyphen 


! old !  +  /  {  _  $  }  @  ~  &  # (old = Jorma 1985)

! JMR 2012-09-18
 %>   !!= * @CODE@ 


 ;


!! !!Sets
Sets

Vo =   о у ё ю О У Ё Ю ;   !!= * @CODE@ 
VO =   ӧ ӱ Ӧ Ӱ;              !!= * @CODE@ 
Ve =   а е и э я А Е И Э Я ;  !!= * @CODE@ 
Vow =  Vo VO Ve ы Ы ;   !!= * @CODE@ 

Cns =  б в г д ж з й к л м н ҥ п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ !!= * @CODE@ 
       з2 к2 н2 т2 ;   !!= @CODE@

CnsAll =  б в г д ж з й к л м н ҥ п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ !!= * @CODE@ 
       Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н Ҥ П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ
       з2 к2 н2 т2 ;   !!= @CODE@
       
CnsNoj =  б в г д ж з к л м н ҥ п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ  !!= * @CODE@ 
          Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н Ҥ П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ;    !!= @CODE@ 

Cst =  б в г д ж з к п с т ф х ц ч ш щ      !!= * @CODE@ 
       Б В Г Д Ж З К П С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ;     !!= @CODE@ 

Ltrs = Vow Cns  ъ ь Ъ Ь ;   !!= * @CODE@ 

all =  Ltrs  %- ;    !!= * @CODE@ 



Definitions

BackRounded = [[ :Vo (•:)|%^VoTrigger: (%^Sonorant:|%^Obstruent:) %-] [ Cns: |й:|(ʼ:) ь:|%{ьØ%}:| :ы | %> | Ы1: | Ы2:о| Ы2:ы]*  ] ;

FrontRounded = [[:VO  (•:)|%^VOTrigger: (%^Sonorant:|%^Obstruent:) %-] [ Cns: |й:|(ʼ:) ь:|%{ьØ%}:| :ы | %> | Ы1: | Ы2:ӧ| Ы2:ы]* ] ;

FrontUnrounded = [ [:Ve (•:) |ы •:|#|%^VeTrigger: (%^Sonorant:|%^Obstruent:) %-] [ Cns: |й:|(ʼ:) ь:|%{ьØ%}:| :ы | %> | Ы1: | Ы2:е| Ы2:ы | Е2:]*  ] ;

!! !!Rules
Rules


"Palatal mark loss before vowel"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __ 
    ь:0  <=>   _ (%{аы%}:|%{еы%}:|%{оы%}:|%{ӧы%}:) %> [А2:|Е2:|:е] ;
!! имне+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/Ат
!!€ имнь%{еы%}%>А2т
!!€ имн00%>ят
!! витнь>Ы2^END
!               _ %{яы%}: %^END: ; ! This is old orthography, the new form
! башнь%{яы%}                      ! is башне -> башнят
! башн0я
     _ %{еы%}: [# | %- |  %^END:] ;
     _ %{аы%}: [# | %- |  %^END:] ;

! JMR 2012-09-18
"Onset vowel loss in suffix after stem vowel"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
 Ы1:0 <=>  [ :Vow (•:) |%^VoTrigger: %-|%^VOTrigger: %-|%^VeTrigger: %-] %> _ ;
! [ :Vow (•:)|[А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|П|Т|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ы|Э|Ӹ|Ӱ|Ӓ|О|Ӧ|У|Ӱ|Ю|Я] (%^VoTrigger: %-|%^VOTrigger: %-|%^VeTrigger: %-) ] %> _ ;
	
"Onset vowel Е2 realized in suffix е"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  Е2:е <=> [ш к2:|ч к2:|к т2:|н2: ч| з2:|Cns ((ʼ:) ь:)|й:|%{аы%}:|%{еы%}:|%{оы%}:|%{ӧы%}:|Ы2:] %> _ ;
! [Cns ((ʼ:) ь:)|й:|%{аы%}:|%{еы%}:|%{оы%}:|%{ӧы%}:|Ы2:] %> _ ;


"Onset vowel Е2 realized in suffix э"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  Е2:э <=> [у|ӱ|и|ю|о|ӧ] (•:) %> _ ;

"Onset vowel Е2 realized in suffix ZERO"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  Е2:0 <=> [а|ӓ|я|е|э] (•:) %> _ ;

"Onset vowel Ы1 realized in suffix"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  Ы1:ы <=> [ Cns ((ʼ:) ь:) | й | [%^VoTrigger:|%^VeTrigger:|%^VOTrigger:] [%^Sonorant:|%^Obstruent:] %- ] %> _ ;


"suffix-final vowel loss after stem-final vowel"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  Ы2:0 <=>
!    Vow (•:) %> Ы1: ш [ т | к ]  _ %> [ л | н | р | г | ш | д | м | Е2: | А2: ] ;
   Vow (•:)  %> Ы1: ш [ т | к ]  _ %> [ Е2: | А2: ] ;
                Cns %> Ы1: ш [ т | к ]  _ %> [ е ш |Е1: ш | А2: ] ;
                                        _ %> [Е2:|А2:] ;
!        .#. (Cns) [у|ӱ|ӧ|о|е|э] (•:) %> _ %^END:  ; ! пуаш : пу no, wrong string
!! пуаш+V+Imprt+Sg2
!!€ пу>Ы2%^END
!!€ пу>00

!! кияш+V+Imprt+Sg2
!!€ кий%>Ы2%^END
!!€ ки0%>е0


!"suffix-final vowel realized after stem-final consonant"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
!  Ы2:ы <=>      Cns %> [ ж: | д ы м | с ] _ %>     [ л | г | ш [ т | к ] | д | Ы1: ] ;
!           Vow (•:) %> [ ж  | д ы м | с ] _ %> Ы1: [ м | н ] ;
!            %>  Ы1: ш [ т | к ]  _ %> Ы1: ;

"suffix-final vowel realized as -Round in word-final position е "
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  Ы2:е <=>
  FrontUnrounded %> (%{ьØ%}:) [ ( ж: [ Ы2:е | Ы2:ы | Ы2:0 ] %> ) [ Ы1: | ы ] ш [ т | к ] | ы ж | ж: | д| ш | м | д ы м | с ] _ [%^END:| %- ] ;
  FrontUnrounded %> %{ьØ%}: _ [%^END:| %- ] ; !jaska 2017-07-02 [ .#. |%^END:| %- ] ;
 [:Ve (•:) |ы •:|#] [ Cns: |й:|(ʼ:) ь:|%{ьØ%}:| :ы | %> | Ы1: | Ы2:е| Ы2:ы ]+ %> _ [%^END:| %- ] ; ! jaska 2017-07-02 [ .#. |%^END:| %- ] ;
 
 Vow (•:) Cns:* [:Ve (•:) |ы •:] %> _ [%^END:| %- ] ; !jaska 2017-07-02 [ .#. |%^END:| %- ] ;

  FrontUnrounded [ ш %> [т|к]| й:] _ [%^END:| %- ] ; !jaska 2017-07-02 [ .#. | %- ] ;
!! шылаш+V+Imprt+Sg3
!! шыл%>жЫ2%^END
!! шыл%>же0


"suffix-final vowel realized as +Back +Round in word-final position о "
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  Ы2:о <=>
 BackRounded  %> (%{ьØ%}:) [(ж:[Ы2:о|Ы2:ы|Ы2:0] %>) Ы1: ш [т|к]|ы ж|ж:|д|ш|м|д ы м|с] _ [%^END:|%-] ;
 BackRounded  %>  %{ьØ%}:                                                             _ [%^END:|%-]  ; !jaska 2017-07-02 [.#.|%^END:| %- ] ;
      :Vo (•:) [ш к2:|ч к2:|к т2:|н2: ч| з2:| Cns: |й:|(ʼ:) ь:|%{ьØ%}:| :ы | %> | Ы1: | Ы2:о| Ы2:ы ]+  %>  _ [%^END:|%-] ; 
!      :Vo (•:) [ Cns: |й:|(ʼ:) ь:|%{ьØ%}:| :ы | %> | Ы1: | Ы2:о| Ы2:ы ]+  %>  _ [%^END:|%-] ; 
 !jaska 2017-07-02 [ .#. |%^END:| %- ] ;
                                          [.#.|Vow (•:)] Cns:* :Vo (•:) %>  _ [%^END:|%-] ; !jaska 2017-07-02[ .#. |%^END:| %- ] ; 
  BackRounded [ш %>                                                        [т|к]| й:] _ [%^END:|%-] ;
!  BackRounded %>                                                                      _ [%^END:|%-] ;

!BackRounded = [ :Vo (•:) [ Cns: |й:|(ʼ:) ь:|%{ьØ%}:| :ы | %> | Ы1: | Ы2:о| Ы2:ы]*  ] ;

!!€ фрукт>Ы1штЫ2^END
!!€ фрукт>ышто0
! :Vo  Cns: Cns:   %>  [ Ы1: ш т] _ [%^END:|%-] ;



"suffix-final vowel realized as +Front +Round in word-final position ӧ "
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  Ы2:ӧ <=>
 FrontRounded %> (%{ьØ%}:) [ ( ж: [ Ы2:ӧ | Ы2:ы | Ы2:0 ] %> ) Ы1: ш [ т | к ] | ы ж | ж: | д| ш | м | д ы м | с ] _ [%^END:| %- ] ;
 FrontRounded %> %{ьØ%}: _ [%^END:| %- ] ; !jaska 2017-07-02[ .#. |%^END:| %- ] ;
 :VO  (•:) [ Cns: |й:|(ʼ:) ь:|%{ьØ%}:| :ы | %> | Ы1: | Ы2:ӧ| Ы2:ы]+ %> _ [%^END:| %- ] ; !jaska 2017-07-02[ .#. |%^END:| %- ] ;
 Vow (•:) Cns:*  :VO (•:) %> _ [%^END:| %- ] ; !jaska 2017-07-02[ .#. |%^END:| %- ] ;
  FrontRounded  [ш %> [т|к]| й:] _ [%^END:| %- ] ; !jaska 2017-07-02[ .#. | %- ] ;
!! шӱртняш+V+ConNeg:
!!€ шӱртнь%>Ы2%^END
!!€ шӱртнь%>ӧ0


"%{ьØ%}:ь"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __
 %{ьØ%}:ь <=> [н|л] (ʼ:) %> _ [ы [м|ч]|Ы2:ӧ|Ы2:о ] ;
!! толам+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1
!!€ тол%>%{ьØ%}ым
!!€ тол%>ьым

! Retaining stem-final _Е1_ in adjectives and nouns
! It has been removed from Vem stems
! _Е1_ follows much the same pattern as _Ы2_

"suffix-final vowel realized after stem-final consonant"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  Е1:ы <=>  Cns _ %>: [ л | н | р | г | ш | д | м | Ы1: ] ;

"stem-final vowel realized as -Round in word-final position"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  Е1:е <=> Ve (•:) [ Cns | ы ]* Cns _ [ %^END: | %- ] ;

"stem-final vowel realized as +Back +Round in word-final position"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  Е1:о <=> Vo (•:) [ Cns | ы ]* _ [ %^END: | %- ] ;

"stem-final vowel realized as +Front +Round in word-final position"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  Е1:ӧ <=> VO (•:) [ Cns | ы ]* _ [ %^END: | %- ] ;


"suffix-final vowel realized %{аы%}:ы "
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  %{аы%}:ы <=>  Cns _ %>: [ л | н | ж | р | г | ш | д | м | Ы1: ] ;

"stem-final vowel realized %{аы%}:а"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
!  %{аы%}:а <=> Cns _ [ %^END: | %- ] ; Leaving the more permissible jaska 2017-07-02
!"stem-final vowel realized %{аы%}:а"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  %{аы%}:а <=> Cns ((ʼ:) ь:) _ [ %^END: | %- ] ;



"Stem-final non-stressed vowel loss"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __
 Vx:0 <=>        _ %> [Е2:|А2:] ;
        where Vx in (%{аы%} %{оы%} %{ӧы%}) ;

!!€ а•льф{аы}>А2т
!!€ а0льф0>ат

"Stem-final non-stressed %{еы%} loss"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __
 %{еы%}:0 <=>
     _ %> Е2: ;
   [Cns - [н|л]] _ %> А2: ;
   [н|л] (ʼ: ь:)  _ %> А2: ;
!!€ киска•лʼь%{еы%}>А2т
!!€ киска•л000>ят
!!€ пятибо•рь%{еы%}>А2т
!!€ пятибо•рье>ат



"suffix-final vowel realized %{еы%}:ы "
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  %{еы%}:ы <=>  [Cns ((ʼ:) ь)| Vow (•:) 0: ] _ %> [ л | н | р | г | ш | ж | д | м | Ы1: ] ;
!! имне+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom horse/hevonen
!!€ имнʼь%{еы%}%>жЫ2
!!€ имн0ьы%>же


"suffix-final vowel realized Ы2:ы "
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  Ы2:ы <=>
  [Cns ((ʼ:) ь)| Vow (•:) 0: ] _ %> [ л | н | р | г | ш | ж | д | м | Ы1: ] ;
!! пӧрт+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/ys
!! пӧрт%>Ы1штЫ2%>Ы1с%^END
!! пӧрт%>ышты%>0с0


"stem-final vowel realized %{еы%}:е"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  %{еы%}:е <=> Cns ((ʼ:) ь:) _ [ %^END: | %- ] ;


"suffix-final vowel realized %{ӧы%}:ы "
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  %{ӧы%}:ы <=>  [Cns ((ʼ:) ь)| Vow (•:) 0: ] _ %> [ л | н | р | г | ш | ж | д | м | Ы1: ] ;

"stem-final vowel realized %{ӧы%}:ӧ"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  %{ӧы%}:ӧ <=> Cns ((ʼ:) ь) _ [ %^END: | %- ] ;

"suffix-final vowel realized %{оы%}:ы "
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  %{оы%}:ы <=>  Cns ((ʼ:) ь:) _ %> [ л | н | р | г | ш | ж | д | м | Ы1: ] ;

"stem-final vowel realized %{оы%}:о"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  %{оы%}:о <=> Cns ((ʼ:) ь:) _ [ %^END: | %- ] ;

"suffix-final vowel realized %{яы%}:ы "
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  %{яы%}:ы <=>  [Cns (ʼ:) ь| Vow (•:) й] _ %>: [ л | н | р | г | ш | д | м | Ы1: ] ;
        
"stem-final vowel realized %{яы%}:я"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __  
  %{яы%}:я <=> [Cns (ʼ:) ь:| Vow (•:) 0:] _ [ %^END: | %- ] ;

!!€ башнь%{яы%}
!!€ башн0я
